Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.160

Restoration of withdrawn contributions.

The department of retirement systems shall incorporate the development of individual member accounts receivable into its information systems projects for fiscal years 1993 and 1994, so that by January 1, 1994, members of state retirement systems who are otherwise eligible to restore previously withdrawn contributions have the option to make restoration in a manner determined by the department.

[ 1994 c 197 s 31; 1992 c 195 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.